West Virginia, session 2025, HB2343.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4A. CENTRALIZED MANAGEMENT OF COMPLAINTS. §12-4A-2. General purpose. (a) The State Auditor shall have authority to may receive reports of possible fraud, misappropriation, mismanagement, or waste of state funds of the State of West Virginia and to refer such reports to the commission on special investigations, county prosecutors and law-enforcement agencies(b) Effective on the passage of this amendment, the State Auditor shall conduct an audit of county boards of education, regardless of source and conduct audits of county boards of education, including reviews of income received from levies, the state, and federal government.